Illinois, session 104th, SB1913.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by adding 5Section 4.1a as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 10/4.1a new)7    Sec. 4.1a. Criminal background investigations; contracted 8entities. 9    (a) An entity that contracts with the Department of 10Children and Family Services, the Department of Early 11Childhood, a child care facility, or a non-licensed service 12provider to provide a service that places the entity's 13employees in a child care facility shall require each employee 14who is placed or will be placed in such a facility to undergo a 15criminal background investigation. Each entity shall submit an 16applicable employee's fingerprints to the Illinois State 17Police in the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State 18Police. These fingerprints shall be checked against the 19fingerprint records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois 20State Police and Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal 21history records databases. The Illinois State Police shall 22charge a fee for conducting the criminal history records 23check, which shall be deposited into the State Police Services   SB1913- 2 -LRB104 10458 AAS 20533 b1Fund and shall not exceed the actual cost of the records check. 2The Illinois State Police shall provide information concerning 3any criminal charges, and their disposition, now or hereafter 4filed, against an entity's employee who will provide a service 5in a child care facility, upon request of the Department of 6Children and Family Services or the Department of Early 7Childhood when the request is made in the form and manner 8required by the Illinois State Police.9    (b) Information concerning the convictions of an entity's 10employee who is placed, either currently or in the future, in a 11child care facility and who is investigated under this 12Section, including the source of the information and any 13conclusions or recommendations derived from the information, 14shall be provided, upon request, to such entity and the 15entity's employee prior to final action by the Department of 16Children and Family Services or the Department of Early 17Childhood under the agencies' respective authority on the 18application. State conviction information provided by the 19Illinois State Police regarding an entity's employee under 20this Act shall be provided to the operator of such facility, 21and, upon request, to such entity and the entity's employee. 22Any information concerning criminal charges and the 23disposition of such charges obtained by the Department of 24Children and Family Services or the Department of Early 25Childhood shall be confidential and may not be transmitted 26outside the Department of Children and Family Services or the   SB1913- 3 -LRB104 10458 AAS 20533 b1Department of Early Childhood, except as required herein, and 2may not be transmitted to anyone within the Department of 3Children and Family Services or the Department of Early 4Childhood except as needed for the purpose of evaluating 5whether the entity's employee shall be permitted in a child 6care facility. Only information and standards which bear a 7reasonable and rational relation to the performance of the 8entity's contract shall be used by the Department of Children 9and Family Services or the Department of Early Childhood or 10any licensee. Any employee of the Department of Children and 11Family Services, Department of Early Childhood, Illinois State 12Police, or a child care facility receiving confidential 13information under this Section who gives or causes to be given 14any confidential information concerning any criminal 15convictions of an applicant, employee, or volunteer of a child 16care facility or non-licensed service provider or an employee 17who is placed in a child care facility by a contracted entity, 18shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless release of such 19information is authorized by this Section.